Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1191.
do enact as follows:AB1191,11Section 1. 299.485 of the statutes is created to read:AB1191,2,22299.485 Products containing PFAS. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB1191,2,43(a) “Fabric treatment” means a substance applied to fabric to give the fabric 4one or more characteristics, such as stain or water resistance.AB1191,2,125(b) “Food packaging” means a container applied to or providing a means to 6market, protect, handle, deliver, serve, contain, or store a food or beverage. “Food 7packaging” includes a unit package, an intermediate package, and a shipping 8container; unsealed receptacles, such as carrying cases, crates, cups, plates, bowls, 9pails, rigid foil and other trays, wrappers and wrapping films, bags, and tubs; and 10an individually assembled part of a food package, such as any interior or exterior 11blocking, bracing, cushioning, weatherproofing, exterior strapping, coating, closure, 12ink, and label.AB1191,2,1613(c) “Intentionally added PFAS” means PFAS that are deliberately added 14during the manufacture of a product where the continued presence of PFAS is 15desired in the final product or one of the product’s components to perform a specific 16function.AB1191,2,2017(d) “Juvenile product” means a product designed or marketed for use by 18infants and children under the age of 12, but does not include an electronic product 19such as a personal computer, audio and video equipment, calculator, wireless 20phone, game console, or any associated peripheral.AB1191,2,2221(e) “PFAS” means a fluorinated organic chemical containing at least one fully 22fluorinated carbon atom.AB1191,3,223(f) “Textile furnishings” means textile goods of a type customarily used in 1households and businesses, including draperies, floor coverings, furnishings, 2bedding, towels, and tablecloths.AB1191,3,53(g) “Unavoidable use” means a use of PFAS that is protective or beneficial to 4public health or safety or to the environment and for which there are no feasible 5alternatives available with a lower risk to public health and the environment.AB1191,3,86(2) Prohibitions. (a) Beginning on January 1, 2032, no person may 7distribute, sell, or offer for sale any of the following products if the product contains 8intentionally added PFAS:AB1191,3,991. Food packaging, or food products contained in food packaging.AB1191,3,10102. Carpets or rugs.AB1191,3,11113. Cleaning products.AB1191,3,12124. Cookware.AB1191,3,13135. Cosmetics.AB1191,3,14146. Dental floss.AB1191,3,15157. Fabric treatments.AB1191,3,16168. Juvenile products.AB1191,3,17179. Menstruation products.AB1191,3,181810. Textile furnishings.AB1191,3,191911. Ski wax.AB1191,3,202012. Upholstered furniture.AB1191,3,222113. A product for which the manufacturer has failed to provide the 22information required under sub. (4).AB1191,4,223(b) The department may, by rule, identify products, in addition to those under 1par. (a) 1. to 13., by category or use that may not be distributed, sold, or offered for 2sale, and designate effective dates for such prohibitions.AB1191,4,53(c) Beginning on January 1, 2038, no person may distribute, sell, or offer for 4sale any product that contains intentionally added PFAS, unless the department 5has determined, by rule, that the use of PFAS in the product is an unavoidable use.AB1191,4,66(3) Exemptions. This section does not apply to any of the following:AB1191,4,87(a) A product for which federal law governs the presence of PFAS in the 8product in a manner that preempts state law.AB1191,4,99(b) Firefighting foam regulated under s. 299.48.AB1191,4,1010(c) The sale or resale of a used product.AB1191,4,1311(d) A prosthetic or orthotic device, or any product that is a medical device or 12drug or that is otherwise used in a medical setting or in medical applications 13regulated by the U.S. food and drug administration.AB1191,4,1514(e) A product for which the department has determined, by rule, that the use 15of PFAS in the product is an unavoidable use.AB1191,4,2216(4) Information required. (a) On or before January 1, 2032, a 17manufacturer of a product distributed, sold, or offered for sale that contains 18intentionally added PFAS shall submit to the department a brief description of the 19product; the purpose for which PFAS is used in the product; the amount of each 20type of PFAS in the product; the name, address, and phone number for the 21manufacturer; and any additional information requested by the department as 22needed to implement this section.AB1191,5,323(b) A manufacturer shall submit the information required under par. (a) 1whenever a new product that contains intentionally added PFAS is distributed, 2sold, or offered for sale, and shall revise information provided to the department 3whenever there is a significant change in the information.AB1191,5,134(5) Testing; certificate of compliance. If the department has reason to 5believe that a product contains intentionally added PFAS and the product is being 6distributed, sold, or offered for sale, the department may direct the manufacturer of 7the product to, within 30 days, provide the department with testing results that 8demonstrate the amount of each of the PFAS in the product. If testing shows that 9the product does not contain intentionally added PFAS, the manufacturer shall 10provide the department with the testing results and a certificate attesting that the 11product does not contain intentionally added PFAS. If testing shows that the 12product contains intentionally added PFAS, the manufacturer shall provide the 13department with the testing results and the information required under sub. (4).AB1191,5,1614(6) Penalty. A person that violates sub. (2) (a) or (c) shall be subject to a 15forfeiture of $100 for each violating product, for each day that the violation 16continues.AB1191,5,1717